Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.545

Condensed compliance report form—Audit of districts submitting condensed compliance report forms.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a condensed compliance report form for second-class districts by August 1, 2011. The report form shall allow districts the option of indicating one of the following for each funded program:

(a) The district has complied or received a waiver approved by the state board of education or superintendent of public instruction;

(b) The district has not complied, accompanied by an explanation or the steps taken to comply; or

(c) The district has received a grant for less than half of a full-time equivalent instructional staff.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may conduct random audits of second-class districts that submit a condensed compliance report under RCW 28A.330.250. The purpose of the audit is to determine whether documentation exists to support a school district superintendent's condensed compliance report.

[ 2018 c 177 s 505; 2011 c 45 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.

Conflict with federal requirements—2011 c 45: See note following RCW 28A.330.250.